Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3108
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Relocation Incentive Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Revenue; and

(2) Qualifying employee means an individual who moves to the State of Nebraska for the purpose of accepting a position of employment.

Laws 2024, LB1023, § 2.